Maine, session 132, LD1566.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12002, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. Member representing lived experience. "Member representing lived
experience" means a board member serving on a board established in section 12004-I who
has first-hand knowledge or direct experience related to the content, subject matter,
responsibilities or authority of the board that helps increase equity in the representation of
perspectives and backgrounds of members; is not otherwise compensated for the member's
time serving on the board by the member's employer or the entity the member represents;
and is explicitly identified as a member representing lived experience in the statutory
language establishing the member's position as a member of a board.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §12002-B, first ¶, as amended by PL 1989, c. 503, Pt. B, §26, is
further amended to read:
Members of boards shall must be paid a legislative per diem, another specified daily
rate of compensation, a salary, expenses only or no compensation, as established for each
board in sections 12004‑A to 12004‑L. Any board for which a legislative per diem, another
specified daily rate of compensation or a salary is specified shall is also be authorized to
receive expenses as provided in section 12002‑A. If the rate of compensation specifies
expenses only, the member shall must receive expenses as provided in section 12002‑A. If
the rate of compensation specifies "not authorized," the member shall may not receive no
compensation or expenses except as authorized or allowed by subsection 3.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §12002-B, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Lived experience compensation. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, beginning October 1, 2025, a member representing lived experience who is
serving on a board established in section 12004-I and is not otherwise compensated for the
member's time serving on the board by the member's employer or the entity the member
represents may be compensated in an amount not to exceed the legislative per diem for the
Page 1 - 132LR1936(03)

member's time and reimbursed for expenses, including but not limited to meals and
refreshments provided during the meeting of the board, child care and travel, to the extent
that the department or agency of State Government with which the board is associated has
sufficient money in the budget of the department or agency to provide the compensation
and reimburse the expenses. The associated department or agency shall determine the
amount and manner of compensation provided to members of the board. If the department
or agency with which the board is associated does not have sufficient money in the budget
of the department or agency to provide compensation and reimburse expenses, a member
representing lived experience or the board with which the member is associated may apply
for compensation pursuant to subsection 4.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §12002-B, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Lived experience funding; application for compensation. To the extent that
funding is available and appropriated by the Legislature for the purpose of providing
compensation to members with lived experience, a member or the board with which the
member is associated may apply to the Secretary of State for compensation to the extent
allowable pursuant to subsection 3. The Secretary of State shall establish policies or
procedures, as necessary, to prioritize compensation for members representing lived
experience.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §12003-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1989, c. 503, Pt. B, §28, is
further amended to read:
2. Compensation of advisory boards. Compensation provided to members of boards,
defined in section 12004‑I as advisory boards or boards with minimal authority, shall may
not exceed $25 the legislative per day diem for their time and payment of expenses.
A. Advisory and other boards, as defined in section 12004‑I, which that are not
authorized by law to be reimbursed for expenses shall are not be eligible for this
reimbursement except as authorized or allowed by section 12002-B, subsection 3.
Sec. 6. Lived experience funding distribution process developed by
Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall develop a process for compensating
members of boards or commissions who are identified as members representing lived
experience as defined in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 12002, subsection 3-
B and as allowable under Title 5, section 12002-B, subsections 3 and 4. The process must
include the development of an application for members representing lived experience or
the board with which the member is associated to apply for compensation, the development
of a method of communication for any decisions to applicants who apply for compensation
and the development of policies or procedures governing the prioritization of compensation
requests. If no funding is available, the process is suspended.
Sec. 7. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
SECRETARY OF STATE, DEPARTMENT OF
Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions 0692
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to compensate individuals serving on boards and
commissions with lived experience.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Page 2 - 132LR1936(03)

All Other $5,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,000 $0
Page 3 - 132LR1936(03)